North Dakota statutes. TITLE 33 County Justice Court
CHAPTER 33-06 Eviction [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 8]

Cross-References.

For current provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-32.

33-06-01.
When eviction maintainable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 8.

33-06-02.
Appearance — Notice of intention to evict — When required — When and how served. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 8.

33-06-03.
Legal representatives may bring eviction actions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 8.

33-06-04.
Eviction actions not joinable with other actions — Exception — When counterclaims only interposable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 8.